Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 461.
SECTION 2. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a person may not:
(a) Sell, or offer to sell, a winning ticket or share;
(b) Purchase, or offer to purchase, a winning ticket or share; or
(c) Claim, or offer to  claim, a winning ticket or share for another person for compen-
sation.
(2) This section does not apply to any prize that the Oregon State  Lottery Commission
authorizes lottery game retailers to pay under ORS 461.250.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 4. If the amount of the purchase price of a  lottery ticket that is purchased in
violation of section 2 of  this 2025 Act is allowed as a deduction for federal tax purposes, the
amount of the purchase price shall be  added to federal taxable income for Oregon tax pur-
poses.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 6. If the amount of the  purchase price of a lottery ticket that is purchased in
violation of section 2 of this 2025 Act is allowed as a deduction for  federal tax purposes, the
amount of the purchase price shall be added to federal  taxable income for Oregon tax pur-
poses.
SECTION 7. Sections 4 and 6 of this 2025 Act apply to purchases of  lottery tickets made
in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 8.  ORS 461.250 is amended to read:
461.250. Upon recommendation of  the Director of the Oregon State Lottery, the Oregon State
Lottery Commission shall adopt  rules to establish a system of verifying the validity of tickets or
shares claimed to win prizes and to effect payment of such prizes, provided:
(1) For the convenience of the public, lottery game  retailers may be authorized by the commis-
sion to pay winners of up to $5,000 after performing validation procedures on their premises appro-
priate to the lottery game involved.
(2) A prize may not be paid to a person under 18 years of age.
(3) A video lottery game prize may not be paid to a person under 21 years of age.
Enrolled House Bill 3115 (HB 3115-A) Page 1
(4) A prize may  not be paid arising from claimed tickets or shares that are stolen, counterfeit,
altered, fraudulent, unissued, produced or  issued in error, unreadable, not received or not recorded
by the Oregon State Lottery by applicable deadlines, lacking in captions that confirm and agree with
the lottery  play symbols as appropriate to the lottery game involved or not in compliance with such
additional specific rules or with public  or confidential validation and security tests of the lottery
appropriate to the particular lottery game involved. However, the commission  may adopt rules to
establish a  system of verifying the validity of claims to prizes greater than $600 that are otherwise
not payable under this subsection due  to a lottery game retailer’s losing, damaging or destroying the
winning ticket or share while performing validation procedures  thereon, and to effect payment of
verified claims. A verification system established by the commission shall include appropriate  public
or confidential validation and security tests.
(5) A particular prize in any lottery game may not be paid more than once, and in the event  of
a binding determination  that more than one claimant is entitled to a particular prize, the sole rem-
edy of such claimants is the award to each of them of an equal share in the prize.
(6) The commission may specify that winners of less than $25 claim such prizes from either  the
same lottery game retailer who sold the winning ticket  or share or from the lottery itself and may
also specify that the lottery game retailer who sold the winning ticket or share be responsible  for
directly paying that prize.
(7) Holders of tickets or shares shall have the right to claim prizes for one year  after the
drawing or the end of the lottery game  or play in which the prize was won. The commission may
define shorter time periods  to claim prizes and for eligibility for entry into drawings involving en-
tries or finalists. If a valid claim is not made for a prize payable  directly by the lottery commission
within the applicable period, the unclaimed prize shall remain the  property of the commission and
shall be allocated to the benefit of the public purpose.
(8)(a) The right of any person to a prize shall not be assignable, except that:
(A) Payment of any prize may be made according to the terms of a  deceased prize winner’s
signed beneficiary designation form filed with the commission or, if no such  form has been filed, to
the estate of the deceased prize winner.
(B) Payment of any prize shall be made to a  person designated pursuant to an appropriate ju-
dicial order or pursuant  to a judicial order approving the assignment of the prize in accordance with
ORS 461.253.
(b) The director,  commission and state shall be discharged of all further liability with respect
to a  specific prize payment upon making that prize payment in accordance with this subsection or
ORS 461.253.
(9) A ticket or share may  not be purchased by, and a prize may not be paid to, a member of the
commission, the director, the assistant directors or any employee of the  state lottery or to any
spouse, child, brother, sister or parent of such person.
(10) Payments made  according to the terms of a deceased prize winner’s signed beneficiary
designation form filed with the commission  are effective by reason of the contract involved and this
statute and are not to be considered as testamentary devices or subject to ORS chapter 112. The
director, commission and state shall be discharged of all liability upon payment of a prize.
(11) In accordance with the provisions of the Servicemembers  Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. [ 3935]
3901 et seq., a person while in active military service may  claim exemption from the one-year ticket
redemption requirement under subsection (7) of this section. However,  the person must notify the
commission by providing satisfactory evidence  of possession of the winning ticket within the one-
year period, and must claim the prize or share no later than  one year after discharge from active
military service.
(12) The name and address of a prize winner are exempt from disclosure under ORS
192.311 to 192.478 and may not be publicly disclosed  by the Oregon State Lottery or the
commission unless the prize winner provides written authorization for such disclosure.
SECTION 9.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3115 (HB 3115-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3115 (HB 3115-A) Page 3